California, session 20252026, AB2637.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2070.1 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:2070.1. (a) Any An insurer whose insured has made a claim under his or her the insured’s residential fire or property insurance policy for loss due, in whole or in part, to corrosive soils shall, at least 30 days before the expiration of the applicable statute of limitation, notify its insured in writing of the statute of limitation applicable to the insured’s claim for damage. Failure of the insurer to provide the written notice shall operate to toll the applicable statute of limitation for a period of 30 days from the date written notice is actually given. The notice shall not be required if the insurer has received notice that the insured is represented by an attorney. This(b) This section applies only to claims presented and not denied prior to before January 1, 1989, and to claims presented on or after January 1, 1989.